Louisiana, session 2026, HB862.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:126(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§126. Wildlife Rehabilitation Program; exemption
* * *
E.(1) It shall be unlawful for an individual exempted under the provisions
of this Section to use the wildlife in any manner for the purposes of exploitation,
including for any promotional or commercial purpose, or for the purposes of pet
trade. Any such act shall be grounds for seizure of the wildlife by the department
and revocation of any issued permit.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions contained in this Subsection, any not-for-
profit organization dedicated to the rehabilitation of wildlife or other animals may
advertise or promote their organization, including through the use of photographs or
videos of the animals, through any medium, platform, or other mechanism to solicit
any public or private donations, gifts, or grants from individuals, corporations, or any
other entities.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1114 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 862